Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 13

Voluntary Corporate Changes

45-2-1301. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bank” means a state or a national bank;

“Continuing bank” means a merging bank the charter of which becomes the charter of the resulting bank;

“Converting bank” means a bank converting from a state to a national bank, or the reverse;

“Merger” includes consolidation;

“Merging bank” means a party to a merger;

“National bank” means a national banking association located in this state;

“Resulting bank” means the bank resulting from a merger or conversion; and

“State bank” means a bank chartered by this state.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.401); T.C.A., § 45-601.

Cross-References. Conversion of financial institutions, title 45, ch. 11.

Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Law Reviews.

State Regulation of Bank Holding Companies and the Future of Interstate Banking: A Tennessee Perspective (Colman B. Hoffman and Kathryn R. Edge), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 383 (1984).

45-2-1302. Resulting national bank.

Subject to this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, a state bank may convert into a resulting national bank, or a state or national bank in operation for at least three (3) years shall have the right to merge with any other bank in operation for at least three (3) years in this state so as to result in a national bank. The action to be taken by the merging or converting bank, if a state bank, and its rights and liabilities and those of its stockholders, shall be the same as those prescribed for national banks at the time of the action by the laws of the United States and not by the laws of this state, except that a vote of the holders of two-thirds (2/3) of each class of voting stock of a state bank shall be required for a merger or conversion and that, on conversion by a state bank into a national bank, the rights of dissenting stockholders shall be those specified in § 45-2-1309. The requirement that both banks be in operation for three (3) years shall not apply if:

Both merging banks have their principal offices in the same county; or

One (1) merging bank was in existence, as defined in [former] § 45-12-102, as a bank prior to July 1, 1985, and was located in one (1) of the counties in Tennessee having a population in excess of two hundred thousand (200,000), according to the 1970 federal decennial census, and the other merging bank has been in operation for three (3) years;

Notwithstanding § 45-2-614, the resulting national bank may create and operate branch banks in the county where the merging banks or any branch of either of the merging banks was located prior to the merger.

Upon the completion of the merger or conversion, the franchise of any merging or converting state bank shall automatically terminate.

A national bank in operation for at least three (3) years shall have the right to merge with an association as defined in § 45-3-104, in operation for at least three (3) years in this state so as to result in a national bank. The action to be taken by the merging bank or association and its rights and liabilities and those of its stockholders shall be the same as those prescribed for national banks at the time of the action by the laws of the United States and not by the laws of this state, except that a vote of the holders of two-thirds (2/3) of each class of voting stock of a state association shall be required for a merger. The requirement that both financial institutions be in operation for three (3) years shall not apply if both merging institutions have their principal offices in the same county.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.402); T.C.A., § 45-602; Acts 1983, ch. 74, § 1; 1985, ch. 174, § 3; 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1986, ch. 615, § 1; 2001, ch. 54, § 21; 2003, ch. 32, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former §45-12-102 referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1995, ch. 165, § 1.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 64.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-2-1303. Resulting state bank.

Upon approval by the commissioner:

Banks whose principal offices are located in this state and have been in operation for at least three (3) years may be merged to result in a state bank; or

A national bank may convert into a state bank, except that the action by a national bank shall be taken in the manner prescribed by and shall be subject to limitations and requirements imposed by the laws of the United States, which shall also govern the rights of its dissenting shareholders.

The requirement that both banks be in operation for three (3) years shall not apply if:

Both merging banks have their principal offices in the same county; or

One (1) merging bank was in existence, as defined in [former] § 45-12-102, as a bank prior to July 1, 1985, and was located in one (1) of those counties in Tennessee having a population in excess of two hundred thousand (200,000), according to the 1970 federal decennial census, and the other merging bank has been in operation for three (3) years.

Notwithstanding § 45-2-614:

The resulting state bank may create and operate branch banks in any county where the merging banks or any branch of either of the merging banks was located prior to the merger; and

A state bank, whether or not a merging bank, with the approval of the commissioner, may create and operate branch banks in any county where a branch bank, office, or agency of the bank was maintained and operated on April 6, 1925.

Upon approval of the commissioner, a state bank in operation for at least three (3) years shall have the right to merge with an association as defined in § 45-3-104 in operation for at least three (3) years in this state so as to result in a state bank. This part shall govern any merger or consolidation pursuant to this subsection (c). The requirement that both financial institutions be in operation for three (3) years shall not apply if both institutions have their principal offices in the same county. The resulting state bank may create and operate branch banks in accordance with § 45-2-614.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.403); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-603; Acts 1983, ch. 74, § 2; 1984, ch. 555, § 1; 1985, ch. 174, § 4; 1985, ch. 204, § 1; 1986, ch. 615, § 1; 2001, ch. 54, § 22; 2003, ch. 32, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former §45-12-102, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1995, ch. 165, § 1.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 64.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

45-2-1304. Merger procedure — Resulting state bank.

The board of directors of each merging state bank shall, by a majority of the entire board, approve a merger agreement, which shall contain:

The name of each merging bank and location of each office;

With respect to the resulting bank:

Its name and the location of the principal and of each additional office, which shall not be at places other than pre-existing offices of any merging bank;

The name and residence of each director to serve until the next annual meeting of the stockholders;

The name and residence of each officer;

The amount of capital, the number of shares and the par value of each share;

Whether preferred stock is to be issued and the amount, terms, and preference; and

The designation of the continuing bank, the charter of which is to be the charter of the resulting bank, together with the amendments to the continuing charter and to the continuing bylaws;

Provisions governing the manner of converting the shares of the merging banks into shares of the resulting state bank;

A statement that the agreement is subject to approval by the commissioner and by the stockholders of each merging bank;

Provisions governing the manner of disposing of the shares of the resulting state bank not taken by dissenting stockholders of merging banks;

Provisions for terminating any activities and disposing of any assets that do not conform to the requirements of the resulting institution when the merger involves an association; and

Other provisions that the commissioner requires in order to discharge the commissioner's duties with respect to the merger.

After approval by the board of directors of each merging state bank, the merger agreement shall be submitted to the commissioner for approval, together with certified copies of the authorizing resolutions of each board of directors showing approval by a majority of the entire board and evidence of proper action by the board of directors of any merging national bank.

The commissioner shall approve the agreement if it appears that:

The resulting state bank meets the requirements of state law as to the formation of a new state bank;

The agreement provides an adequate capital structure, including surplus, in relation to the deposit liabilities of the resulting state bank and its other activities that are to continue or are to be undertaken;

The agreement is fair;

The merger is not contrary to the public interest; and

When the merger involves an association, the schedule for termination of any nonconforming activities and disposition of any nonconforming assets is timely, and the plan for termination and disposition does not include any unsafe and unsound practices.

If the commissioner disapproves an agreement, the commissioner shall state any objections and give an opportunity to the merging banks to amend the merger agreement to obviate the objections.

The merger procedure prescribed in this section shall also apply to the merger of an association and state bank resulting in a state bank.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.404); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-604; Acts 1985, ch. 174, §§ 5-7.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 64.

45-2-1305. Approval by stockholders of merging state banks.

To be effective, a merger that is to result in a state bank must be approved by the stockholders of each merging state bank by a majority vote of the outstanding voting stock of each class eligible to vote for the merger; provided, that a greater vote may be required by the charter. The vote shall be held at a meeting called to consider the action. The vote shall constitute the adoption of the charter and bylaws of the continuing state bank, including the amendments in the merger agreement, as the charter and bylaws of the resulting bank.

Notice of the meeting of the stockholders must be given by mail at least fifteen (15) days before the date of the meeting to each stockholder of record of each merging bank at the stockholder's address on the books of the stockholder's bank, who has not waived notice in writing. The notice shall state that a dissenting stockholder will be entitled to payment of the value of the stockholder's shares only if written notice of intent to demand payment is delivered to the bank before the vote is taken, and the stockholder does not vote the shares in favor of the plan.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.405); T.C.A., § 45-605; Acts 1984, ch. 571, § 1; 1993, ch. 95, § 1; 1994, ch. 551, §§ 13, 14; 2020, ch. 605, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section 2 of Acts 1984, ch. 571, provided that:

“This act shall not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, or proceedings that were begun before its effective date.”

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (b), in the first sentence, substituted “must” for “shall”, deleted “publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the place where the principal office of each merging bank is located, at least once a week for four (4) successive weeks, and by” following “given by”, and deleted the second sentence, which read, “No notice by publication need be given if written waivers are received from the holders of two thirds (2/3) of the outstanding shares of each class of voting stock.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 605, § 10. March 20, 2020.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 64.

45-2-1306. Effective date of merger — Certificate of merger.

A merger that is to result in a state bank shall, unless a later date is specified in the agreement, become effective upon the filing with the commissioner of the executed agreement, together with copies of the resolutions of the stockholders of each merging bank approving it, certified by the bank's president or a vice president and a cashier. The charters of the merging banks, other than the continuing bank, shall thereupon automatically terminate.

The commissioner shall then issue to the resulting bank a certificate of merger, which shall constitute a continuing charter, specifying the name of each merging bank and the name of the resulting state bank. The certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the merger and of the correctness of all proceedings therefor in all courts and places, and shall be recorded in the same manner as is provided for the recording of a charter of a new bank in § 45-2-205(c).

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.406); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-606.

45-2-1307. Conversion of national into state bank.

Except as provided in § 45-2-1310, a national bank located in this state that follows the procedure prescribed by the laws of the United States to convert into a state bank may be granted a state charter by the commissioner if the commissioner finds that each office of the national bank is legally in operation, that the resulting state bank will have an adequate capital structure, including surplus, in relation to its deposit liabilities and its other activities, not less than the capital structure required for a new state bank, and that the officers and directors of the resulting bank are persons of sound judgment and discretion.

The national bank may apply for the charter by filing with the commissioner:

A certificate signed by its president and cashier and by a majority of the entire board of directors, setting forth the corporate action taken in compliance with the laws of the United States governing the conversion of a national to a state bank; and

The plan of conversion and the proposed articles of incorporation approved by the stockholders, for the operation of the bank as a state bank.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.407); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-607.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 64.

45-2-1308. Continuation of corporate entity — Use of old name.

A resulting state or national bank shall be considered the same business and corporate entity as each merging bank or as the converting bank with all the property rights, powers, duties, fiduciary appointments subject to § 45-2-1310 and obligations of each merging bank or the converting bank, except as affected by the state law in the case of a resulting state bank or the federal law in the case of a resulting national bank, and by the charter and bylaws of the resulting bank.

A resulting bank shall have the right to use the name of any merging bank or of the converting bank whenever it deems it more convenient to do so.

Any reference to a merging or converting bank in any writing, whether executed or taking effect before or after the merger or conversion, shall be deemed a reference to the resulting bank if not inconsistent with the other provisions of the writing.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.408); T.C.A., § 45-608; Acts 1999, ch. 112, § 11.

45-2-1309. Dissenting stockholders.

The owners of shares of a state bank shall have dissenters rights as provided by the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, ch. 23, part 1, with respect to any plan of merger, merger agreement, plan of conversion, plan of share exchange or any other corporate action described in §48-23-102.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.409); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-609; Acts 1981, ch. 330, § 2; 1983, ch. 441, § 2; 1994, ch. 551, § 15.

45-2-1310. Resulting bank without trust powers.

Where a resulting state bank is not to exercise trust powers, the commissioner shall not approve a merger or conversion until satisfied that adequate provision has been made for successors to fiduciary positions held by the merging banks or the converting bank.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.410); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-610.

45-2-1311. Nonconforming assets or business.

If a merging or converting bank has assets that do not conform to the requirements of state law for the resulting state bank, or carries on business activities that are not permitted for the resulting state bank, the commissioner may permit a reasonable time to conform with state law.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.411); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-611.

45-2-1312. [Reserved.]

If a bank is determined to be in financial difficulty by the appropriate regulatory officials, as defined in § 45-2-1402, it may be merged into any other bank in this state, notwithstanding §§ 45-2-614 and 45-2-1302(a).

The merger procedure shall be the same as that procedure required for a regular merger pursuant to this part except that no notice by publication need be given.

Prior to approving a merger pursuant to this section, the appropriate regulatory officials shall determine that alternative methods of protecting the depositors and stockholders of a bank in financial difficulty are not feasible.

Acts 1981, ch. 330, § 1.

45-2-1314. Share exchanges.

A corporation may acquire all of the outstanding shares of one (1) or more classes or series of a bank, and a bank may acquire all of the outstanding shares of one (1) or more classes or a series of another bank or corporation, if the board of directors of each corporation or bank adopts and its shareholders, if required by § 48-21-104, approve the exchange. The share exchange shall be subject to and in accordance with the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapter 21, except as chapter 21 of the Tennessee Business Corporation Act is inconsistent with this title.

Any share exchange involving a bank or a bank holding company shall be subject to any regulatory approval required by applicable law.

Acts 1994, ch. 551, § 16.

45-2-1315. Review of exchange by commissioner — Hearings — Costs.

Upon the request of any person or entity that proposes to issue any security in exchange for one (1) or more bona fide outstanding securities of a bank or bank holding company or partly in exchange for outstanding securities of a bank or bank holding company and partly for cash, the commissioner is authorized to approve the terms and conditions of the issuance and exchange after a hearing on the fairness of the terms and conditions at which all persons to whom it is proposed to issue securities in the exchange shall have the right to appear. Nothing in this section shall require the commissioner to hold a hearing or to approve the terms or conditions of any specific exchange of securities. Any party requesting a hearing shall agree to pay the cost for the hearing, including the cost for the department to retain outside legal or investment advice as deemed necessary by the commissioner. The commissioner may require the requesting party to post a bond in cash or by accepted sureties to cover the cost.

Acts 1994, ch. 551, § 17.